Connecticut, session 2026, SB00023.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of three hundred ten thousand dollars be appropriated
to the Department of Children and Families, from the General Fund, for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for annual data collection, analysis
and reporting concerning youth service bureau programs.